Washington statutes.
RCW 8.16.110

Judgment—Payment of award—Decree of appropriation.

Upon the verdict of the jury, or upon the determination by the court of the compensation to be paid for the property sought to be taken as herein provided, judgment shall be entered against such school district in favor of the owner or owners of the real estate sought to be taken, for the amount found as compensation therefor, and upon the payment of such amount by such school district to the clerk of such court for the use of the owner or owners of, and the persons interested in the premises sought to be taken, the court shall enter a decree of appropriation of the real estate sought to be taken, thereby vesting the title to the same in such school district; and a certified copy of such decree of appropriation may be filed in the office of the county auditor of the county wherein the real estate taken is situated, and shall be recorded by such auditor like a deed of real estate, and with like effect. The money so paid to the clerk of the court shall be by him or her paid to the person or persons entitled thereto, upon the order of the court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 274; 1909 p 374 s 11; 1903 c 111 s 11; RRS s 916.]

NOTES:

Recording of deeds of real estate: Title 65 RCW.